Nebraska, session 109, LB31.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB31 LB31
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Legislature finds and declares that:
(a) The use of student surveillance, monitoring, and tracking
technology tools by school districts, other governmental entities, and
companies contracting with schools for the use of student surveys and
student surveillance, monitoring, and tracking has grown exponentially in
recent years, raising serious concerns about transparency, use of
taxpayer dollars, parental rights, and student privacy;
(b) The intersection of government and technology companies
utilizing tools of mass surveillance raises concerns regarding civil
rights and civil liberties;
(c) Numerous public schools in Nebraska have instituted various
tracking systems that surveil and monitor students. The tracking systems
include, but are not limited to, digital hall passes, anti-vaping
devices, fingerprints swipes, cameras, and electronic surveys;
(d) Tools of mass surveillance are being purchased and utilized with
taxpayer funds through contracts with private companies;
(e) Certain tools of mass surveillance may be of legitimate use for
educational purposes and certain technologies can advance the public
policy goals of student success and school safety; and
(f) Parents have a well-established and fundamental right to control
their children's education. Students have a well-established and
fundamental right to privacy from unwarranted government surveillance.
Taxpayers have a well-established right to ensure public entities are
good stewards of public funds and a well-established right to
transparency for governmental operations and expenditures.
(2) The Legislature further finds that public funds should be
primarily dedicated to frontline classroom needs and that tools of mass
surveillance that are purchased for use in schools under the guise of
advancing security or efficiency goals should not compromise personal
liberty or evade citizen transparency.
Sec. 2. (1) On or before December 1, 2025, the State Board of
-2-

LB31 LB31
2025 2025
Education shall develop and distribute a model policy relating to the use
by school districts of student surveillance, monitoring, and tracking
technology. At a minimum, such policy shall require school districts to:
(a) Specifically identify and inventory the type of surveillance
tools or student surveys which gather personal information considered for
use or actually used in the school district, including:
(i) The name and contact information for each private company,
vendor, or governmental entity, providing such technology;
(ii) The cost of each surveillance, monitoring, and tracking
technology tool to purchase and maintain;
(iii) A description of each student surveillance, monitoring, and
tracking technology tool, including a description of privacy protection
measures for each tool and data collection and data sharing and usage
activities;
(iv) Whether or not parents may opt their student out of being
subjected to a student surveillance, monitoring, and tracking tool;
(v) If and how the data from a student surveillance monitoring, and
tracking technology tool will be shared with law enforcement or implicate
punitive actions under the Student Discipline Act;
(vi) How student surveillance monitoring, and tracking technology
tools ensure proper accommodations for students with disabilities or
individualized education programs;
(vii) How biometric or personally identifiable information is
stored, shared, or sold with the private companies, vendors, or
governmental entities providing such tools; and
(viii) Clearly delineate what remedies are available to students and
parents for violations of personal privacy related to such surveillance,
monitoring, and tracking technology tools, including, but not limited to,
under the Consumer Protection Act, the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims
Act and section 79-2,104; and
(b) Post the inventory and information related to surveillance,
-3-

LB31 LB31
2025 2025
monitoring, and tracking technology tools considered for use or actually
utilized by the school district on the school district's website and
ensure such inventory and information is available in hard copy upon
request.
(2) Beginning May 1, 2026, each school board shall adopt a written
policy to be implemented by the school district at the start of school
year 2026-27 which provides for standards and guidelines for the purchase
and use of tools of mass surveillance. Such policy shall include
procedures and provisions in conformance with the minimum standards set
forth in the model policy developed by the State Board of Education
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, and may include any other
procedures and provisions the school board deems necessary to conform
with the spirit and intent of this section and section 1 of this act.
-4-